test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_odd_kirjoittaat_oahpa_gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kirjoittaat - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kirjoittaat+V+Inf: kirjoittaat
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kirjoitan
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kirjoitat
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kirjoittaa
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kirjoitamma
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kirjoitatta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kirjoitethaan
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kirjoitin
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kirjoitit
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kirjoitti
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kirjoitimma
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kirjoititta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kirjoitethiin
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kirjoittannu
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: kirjoitettu
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kirjoittanheet
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kirjoittaava
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kirjoittaavat
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kirjoitettava
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kirjoitettavat
     
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kirjoittaisin
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kirjoittaisit
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kirjoittais
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kirjoittaisima
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kirjoittaisitta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kirjoitettais
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+Cond: kirjoitettais
  
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kirjoita
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kirjoittakkaa
     
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kirjoittamassa
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kirjoittamasta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kirjoittamhaan
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kirjoittamala
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kirjoittamatta
